Illinois, session 104th, HB1612.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Appliance Standards Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Efficiency standards for certain products sold or 8    installed in the State assure consumers and businesses 9    that the products meet minimum efficiency performance 10    levels, thus reducing energy and water waste and saving 11    consumers and businesses money on utility bills.12        (2) Efficiency standards save energy and reduce 13    climate-changing emissions and other environmental impacts 14    associated with the production, distribution, and use of 15    electricity, natural gas, and related fuels.16        (3) Efficiency standards also save water, mitigating 17    the effects of short-term and long-term droughts and 18    helping to conserve fresh water supplies.19        (4) Utility savings resulting from more efficient 20    products benefit all consumers but are especially 21    important to low-income families, who spend a 22    disproportionate share of their income on utilities. 23    Efficiency standards also help the State and local   HB1612- 2 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    economies because bill savings can be spent on local goods 2    and services.3        (5) Energy and water savings help reduce or delay the 4    need for expensive investments in new power plants, 5    transmission lines, and distribution system upgrades, new 6    and expanded gas pipelines, and water and sewer 7    infrastructure improvements. 8    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency .10    "Automatic landscape irrigation controller" means a device 11used to remotely control valves that operate a landscape 12irrigation system. "Automatic landscape irrigation controller" 13includes, but is not limited to, a weather-based irrigation 14controller, a soil moisture-based irrigation controller, and a 15timer-based irrigation controller, whether configured as a 16standalone controller, a base controller, an add-on device, or 17a plug-in device. "Automatic landscape irrigation controller" 18does not include an irrigation control device designed for 19attachment to a hose bib or a hose end or an irrigation control 20device designed and marketed for agricultural purposes. 21    "Battery backup" or "uninterruptible power supply charger" 22or "UPS" means a small battery charger system that is voltage 23and frequency dependent and designed to provide power to an 24end-use product in the event of a power outage. "Battery 25backup" or "uninterruptible power supply charger" or "UPS"   HB1612- 3 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1includes a UPS as defined in IEC 62040-3 (2nd edition). 2"Battery backup" or "uninterruptible power supply charger" or 3"UPS" includes a voltage and frequency dependent UPS in which 4the output is dependent on changes in AC input voltage and 5frequency and is not intended to provide additional corrective 6functions, such as those relating to the use of tapped 7transformers.8    "Cold-only unit" means a water cooler that dispenses cold 9water only.10    "Commercial clothes dryer" means a cabinet-like appliance 11designed to dry fabrics in a tumble-type drum with forced air 12circulation that is not distributed in commerce for personal 13use or consumption by individuals.14    "Commercial clothes washer" means a soft-mount 15front-loading or soft-mount top-loading clothes washer that:16        (1) has a clothes container compartment that:17            (A) for horizontal-axis clothes washers, is 18        greater than 3.5 cubic feet; and19            (B) for vertical-axis clothes washers, is greater 20        than 4.0 cubic feet; and21        (2) is designed for use in:22            (A) applications in which the occupants of more 23        than one household will be using the clothes washer, 24        such as multifamily housing common areas and coin 25        laundries; or26            (B) other commercial applications.  HB1612- 4 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    "Commercial dishwasher" means a machine designed to clean 2and sanitize plates, pots, pans, glasses, cups, bowls, 3utensils, and trays by applying sprays of detergent solution, 4with or without blasting media granules, and a sanitizing 5rinse.6    "Commercial fryer" means an appliance, including a cooking 7vessel, in which oil is placed to such a depth that the cooking 8food is essentially supported by displacement of the cooking 9fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel, and in which 10heat is delivered to the cooking fluid by means of an immersed 11electric element or band-wrapped vessel, such as in the case 12of electric fryers, or by heat transfer from gas burners 13through either the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing 14through the cooking fluid, such as in the case of gas fryers.15    "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" means a heated, 16fully enclosed compartment with one or more solid or 17transparent doors designed to maintain the temperature of hot 18food that has been cooked using a separate appliance. 19"Commercial hot food holding cabinet" does not include heated 20glass merchandising cabinets, drawer warmers, or cook-and-hold 21appliances.22    "Commercial oven" means a chamber designed for heating, 23roasting, or baking food by conduction, convection, radiation, 24or electromagnetic energy, or a combination of conduction, 25convention, radiation, or electromagnetic energy.26    "Commercial steam cooker" or "compartment steamer" means a   HB1612- 5 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1device with one or more food-steaming compartments in which 2the energy in the steam is transferred to the food by direct 3contact. "Commercial steam cooker" or "compartment steamer" 4includes, but is not limited to, a countertop model, a 5wall-mounted model, and a floor model mounted on a stand, 6pedestal, or cabinet-style base.7    "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing, 8regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for 9services rendered.10    "Computer" means a device that performs logical operations 11and processes data, with or without input devices and 12displays. "Computer" includes both stationary and portable 13units, as well as a desktop computer, a portable all-in-one, a 14notebook computer, a mobile gaming system, a high 15expandability computer, a small-scale server, a thin client, 16and a workstation. "Computer" includes, at a minimum:17        (1) a central processing unit (CPU) to perform 18    operations or, if no CPU is present, then the device must 19    function as a client gateway to a server and the server 20    acts as a computational CPU;21        (2) ability to support user input devices such as a 22    keyboard, mouse, or touchpad; and23        (3) an integrated display screen or the ability to 24    support an external display screen to output information.25    "Computer" does not include a tablet, a game console, a 26television, a small computer device, a server other than a   HB1612- 6 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1small-scale server, or an industrial computer.2    "Computer monitor" means an analog or digital device of 3diagonal screen size greater than or equal to 17 inches and 4less than or equal to 61 inches, that has a pixel density of 5greater than 5000 pixels per square inch, that is designed 6primarily for the display of computer generated signals for 7viewing by one person in a desk-based environment, and that is 8composed of a display screen and associated electronics. 9"Computer monitor" does not include:10        (1) displays with integrated or replaceable batteries 11    designed to support primary operation without AC mains or 12    external DC power, (e.g., electronic readers, mobile 13    phones, tablets, battery-powered digital picture frames); 14    or15        (2) a television or a signage display.16    "Computer server" means a computer that provides services 17and manages networked resources for client devices, including, 18but not limited to, desktop computers, notebook computers, 19thin clients, wireless devices, personal digital assistants, 20Internet protocol telephones, other computer servers, or other 21network devices.22    "Computer server power supply unit" means a device that 23converts AC or DC input power to one or more DC power outputs 24for the purpose of powering a computer server and that is 25self-contained, physically separable from the motherboard and 26that connects to the system via a removable or hard-wired   HB1612- 7 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1electrical connection.2    "Cook-and-cold unit" means a water cooler that dispenses 3both cold and room temperature water.4    "Covered product" means:5        (1) an automatic landscape irrigation controller;6        (2) a commercial dishwasher;7        (3) a commercial fryer;8        (4) a commercial hot food holding cabinet;9        (5) a commercial oven;10        (6) a commercial steam cooker;11        (7) a computer or computer monitor;12        (8) a computer server power supply unit;13        (9) an electric vehicle supply equipment;14        (10) a faucet;15        (11) an electric heat pump water heater;16        (12) a gas fireplace;17        (13) a portable electric spa; 18        (14) a residential ventilating fan;19        (15) a showerhead;20        (16) a spray sprinkler body;21        (17) a State-regulated battery charger system;22        (18) a urinal;23        (19) a water closet;24        (20) a water cooler; or25        (21) any other product designated by the Director in 26    accordance with Section 15.  HB1612- 8 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    "Decorative gas fireplace" means a vented fireplace, 2including appliances that are freestanding, recessed, zero 3clearance, log set, or a gas fireplace insert, that is fueled 4by natural gas or propane, is marked for decorative use only, 5and is not equipped with a thermostat or intended for use as a 6heater.7    "Director" means the Director of the Environmental 8Protection Agency.9    "Electric heat pump water heater" means an electric 10storage water heater with a maximum current rating of 24 amps 11at a voltage not greater than 250 volts that are designed to 12transfer thermal energy from one temperature level to a higher 13temperature level for the purpose of heating water, including 14all ancillary equipment such as fans, storage tanks, pumps or 15controls necessary for the device to perform.16    "Electric resistance storage water heater" means a water 17heater that uses electricity as the energy source, has a 18nameplate input rating of 12 kW or less, and contains more than 19one gallon of water per 4000 Btu per hour of input.20    "Electric storage water heater" means either an electric 21resistance storage water heater or an electric heat pump water 22heater.23    "Electric vehicle supply equipment" means the conductors, 24including the ungrounded, grounded, and equipment grounding 25conductors, the electric vehicle connectors, attachment plugs, 26and all other fittings, devices, power outlets, or apparatuses   HB1612- 9 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1installed specifically for the purpose of delivering energy 2from the premises wiring to the electric vehicle. Excludes 3conductors, connectors, and fittings that are part of a 4vehicle.5    "Faucet" means a private lavatory faucet, residential 6kitchen faucet, metering faucet, public lavatory faucet, or 7replacement aerator for a private lavatory, public lavatory or 8residential kitchen faucet.9    "Gas fireplace" means a decorative gas fireplace or a 10heating gas fireplace.11    "Federally exempt commercial laundry equipment" means 12commercial clothes dryers and commercial clothes washers 13outside the scope of 42 U.S.C. 6311(21).14    "Flexible demand appliance standard" means a requirement 15for a covered product to have the capability to schedule, 16shift, or curtail the electrical demand of a load-serving 17entity's customer through direct action by the customer or 18through action by a third party, the load-serving entity, or a 19grid balancing authority, with the customer's consent.20    "Hand-held showerhead" means a showerhead that can be held 21or fixed in place for the purpose of spraying water onto a 22bather and that is connected to a flexible hose.23    "Heating gas fireplace" means a vented fireplace, 24including appliances that are freestanding, recessed, zero 25clearance, or a gas fireplace insert, that is fueled by 26natural gas or propane and is not a decorative fireplace.  HB1612- 10 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    "Hot-and-cold unit" means a water cooler that dispenses 2both hot and cold water. "Hot-and-cold unit" includes a water 3cooler that dispenses room temperature water in addition to 4hot and cold water. 5    "Large battery charger system" means a State-regulated 6battery charger system (other than a battery charger system 7for golf carts) with a rated input power of more than 2 8kilowatts.9    "Metering faucet" means a self-closing faucet that 10dispenses a specific volume of water for each actuation cycle 11and in which the volume or cycle duration can be fixed or 12adjustable.13    "On-demand, hot-and-cold unit" means a water cooler that 14heats and cools water as it is requested.15    "Person" means:16        (1) any individual; or17        (2) any corporation, company, association, firm, 18    partnership, society, trust, joint venture, or joint-stock 19    company.20    "Plumbing fixture" means an exchangeable device that 21connects to a plumbing system to deliver and drain away water 22and waste.23    "Portable electric spa" means a factory-built electric spa 24or hot tub that may or may not include integral controls, water 25heating equipment, or water circulating equipment, or any 26combination of these devices.  HB1612- 11 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    "Potentially covered product" means:2        (1) electric resistance storage water heaters;3        (2) federally exempt commercial laundry equipment; or4        (3) replacement tires for passenger and light-duty 5    vehicles.6    "Pressure regulator" means a device that maintains 7constant operating pressure immediately downstream from the 8device, even with higher pressure upstream.9    "Public lavatory faucet" means a fitting designed to be 10installed in nonresidential bathrooms that are exposed to 11walk-in traffic.12    "Replacement aerator" means an aerator sold as a 13replacement and separate from the faucet to which it is 14intended to be attached.15    "Replacement tire" means a tire designed to replace a tire 16sold with a new passenger car or light-duty truck. 17"Replacement tire" does not include a retreaded tire or any of 18the following tires:19    (1) a limited production tire;20    (2) a deep tread tire;21    (3) a winter-type snow tire;22    (4) a space-saver tire;23    (5) a temporary use spare tire;24    (6) a tire with a nominal rim diameter of 12 inches or 25less;26    (7) a motorcycle tire; or  HB1612- 12 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    (8) a tire manufactured specifically for use on an 2off-road motorized recreational vehicle.3    "Residential ventilating fan" means a ceiling-mounted or 4wall-mounted fan, or remotely mounted in-line fan, designed to 5be used in a bathroom or utility room for the purpose of moving 6air from inside the building to the outdoors.7    "Showerhead" means a component or set of components 8distributed in commerce for attachment to a single supply 9fitting and for spraying water onto a bather, typically from 10an overhead position, excluding safety shower showerheads.11    "Spray sprinkler body" means the exterior case or shell of 12a sprinkler incorporating a means of connection to the piping 13system designed to convey water to a nozzle or orifice.14    "State-regulated battery charger system" means a battery 15charger coupled with its batteries or battery chargers and 16their batteries. "State-regulated battery charger system" 17includes, but is not limited to: (1) rechargeable batteries or 18devices incorporating a rechargeable battery and the chargers 19used with them; (2) electronic devices with a battery that are 20normally charged from AC line voltage or DC input voltage 21through an internal or external power supply and a dedicated 22battery charger; (3) the battery and battery charger 23components of devices that are designed to run on battery 24power during part or all of their operations; (4) dedicated 25battery systems primarily designed for electrical or emergency 26backup; and (5) devices whose primary function is to charge   HB1612- 13 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1batteries, along with the batteries they are designed to 2charge, including chargers for power tool batteries and 3chargers for automotive, AA, AAA, C, D, or 9-volt rechargeable 4batteries, as well as chargers for batteries used in larger 5industrial motive equipment and a la carte chargers.6    "State-regulated battery charger system" also includes a 7battery charger system in which the charging circuitry may or 8may not be located within the housing of the end-use device 9itself, as well as in which the battery may be charged with a 10dedicated external charger and separate power supply 11combination. "State-regulated battery charger system" does not 12include a federally regulated battery charger that is covered 13under standards in 10 CFR 430.32(z).14    "Storage-type, hot-and-cold unit" means a water cooler 15that stores thermally conditioned water in a tank and makes 16that water available instantaneously. "Storage-type, 17hot-and-cold unit" includes any point-of-use cooler, any dry 18storage compartment cooler, or any bottled water cooler.19    "Trough-type urinal" means a urinal designed for 20simultaneous use by 2 or more persons.21    "Tub spout diverter" means a device that is designed to 22divert the flow of water into a bathtub so the water discharges 23through a showerhead. 24    "Urinal" means a plumbing fixture that receives only 25liquid body waste and conveys the waste through a trap into a 26drainage system.  HB1612- 14 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    "Water closet" means a plumbing fixture having a 2water-containing receptor that receives liquid and solid body 3waste through an exposed integral trap into a drainage system.4    "Water cooler" means a freestanding device that consumes 5energy to cool and heat potable water. 6    Section 15. Minimum efficiency standards; administrative 7rulemaking.8    (a) Not later December 31, 2025, the Agency shall adopt 9rules establishing flexible demand appliance standards for 10electric heat pump water heaters and minimum efficiency 11standards for all other covered products, except as provided 12in subsection (c). The Agency may not establish minimum 13efficiency standards, except for flexible demand appliance 14standards, for electric heat pump water heaters.15    (b) Not later than one year after the effective date of 16this Act, the Agency shall adopt rules establishing minimum 17efficiency standards for the potentially covered products, or 18in the case of electric resistance storage water heaters, 19flexible demand appliance standards, except as provided in 20subsection (c). If the Agency chooses to not establish minimum 21standards for potentially covered products, they shall report 22such findings, along with justification, to the General 23Assembly. The Agency shall continue to assess potentially 24covered standards annually and report their determination to 25the General Assembly annually for 5 years after the effective   HB1612- 15 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1date of this Act or until the Agency adopts rules establishing 2minimum efficiency standards for a potentially covered 3product, whichever is sooner. 4    (c) The provisions of this Act do not apply to:5        (1) new products manufactured in the State and sold 6    outside the State;7        (2) new products manufactured outside the State and 8    sold at wholesale inside the State for final retail sale 9    and installation outside the State;10        (3) products installed in mobile manufactured homes at 11    the time of construction; or12        (4) products designed expressly for installation and 13    use in recreational vehicles. 14    (d) The rules adopted by the Agency under subsection (a) 15shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards:16        (1) Automatic landscape irrigation controllers shall, 17    at a minimum, meet the water efficiency and performance 18    criteria included within the U.S. Environmental Protection 19    Agency's Specification for Weather-Based Irrigation 20    Controllers, Version 1.1, or its Specification for Soil 21    Moisture-Based Irrigation Controllers, Version 1.0.22        (2) Computers and computer monitors shall, at a 23    minimum, meet requirements that are substantially 24    equivalent to the standards authorized and adopted for 25    computers and computer monitors in California under 26    Sections 25213, 25218(e), 25216.5(d), 25401.9, 25402(a)   HB1612- 16 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    through 25402(c), and 25960, of the California Public 2    Resources Code, and compliance with those requirements 3    shall, at a minimum, be as measured in accordance with 4    test methods that are substantially equivalent to the 5    rules adopted pursuant to those authorities. In addition, 6    the rules adopted by the Agency shall define "computer" 7    and "computer monitor" to have the same meaning as under 8    the California authorities cited in this paragraph (2), 9    and the Agency shall have authority to amend the rules so 10    that the definitions of "computer" and "computer monitor" 11    and the minimum efficiency standards for computers and 12    computer monitors conform to subsequently adopted 13    modifications in rules authorized and adopted under 14    relevant sections of the California Resources Code, or as 15    authorized under this Act with the minimum standards 16    stated in this paragraph (2).17        (3) Electric vehicle supply equipment included in the 18    scope of the ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product 19    Specification for Electric Vehicle Supply Equipment, 20    Version 1.0, shall, at a minimum, meet the certification 21    criteria of that specification.22        (4) Faucets, except for metering faucets, shall, at a 23    minimum, meet the standards shown in this paragraph when 24    tested in accordance with 10 CFR Part 430, Subpart B, 25    Appendix S, "Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Water 26    Consumption of Faucets and Showerheads", and must comply   HB1612- 17 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    with the following requirements:2            (A) Private lavatory faucets and replacement 3        aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.5 4        gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch.5            (B) Residential kitchen faucets and replacement 6        aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.8 7        gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch, with 8        optional temporary flow of 2.2 gallons per minute, 9        provided they default to a maximum flow rate of 1.8 10        gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch after 11        each use.12            (C) Public lavatory faucets and replacement 13        aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 0.5 14        gallons per minute at 60 pounds per square inch.15        (5) Gas fireplaces shall, at a minimum, comply with 16    the following requirements:17            (A) Gas fireplaces shall be capable of 18        automatically extinguishing any pilot flame when the 19        main gas burner flame is extinguished.20            (B) Gas fireplaces must prevent any ignition 21        source for the main gas burner flame from operating 22        continuously for more than 7 days from last use of the 23        main burner.24            (C) Decorative gas fireplaces must have a direct 25        vent configuration or power vent configuration, unless 26        marked for replacement use only.  HB1612- 18 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1            (D) Heating gas fireplaces shall have a fireplace 2        efficiency greater than or equal to 50% when tested in 3        accordance with CSA P.4.1-15, "Testing Method for 4        Measuring Fireplace Efficiency", as amended or 5        revised.6        (6) Large battery charger systems and battery backup 7    or UPS systems shall, at a minimum, meet requirements that 8    are substantially equivalent to the standards authorized 9    and adopted for large battery charger systems and battery 10    backup or UPS systems in California under Sections 25213, 11    25216.5(d), 25218(e), 25401.9, 25402(a) through 25402(c), 12    and 25960, of the California Public Resources Code, and 13    compliance with those requirements shall, at a minimum, be 14    measured in accordance with test methods that are 15    substantially equivalent to those prescribed under the 16    rules adopted pursuant to those authorities. In addition, 17    the rules adopted by the Agency shall define "large 18    battery charger system" and "battery backup or 19    uninterruptible power supply charger (UPS)" to have the 20    same meaning as under the California authorities cited in 21    this paragraph (6), and the referenced rules in this 22    paragraph (6) shall be those adopted on or before the 23    effective date of this Act. However, the Director may 24    amend the rules so that the definitions of 25    "State-regulated battery charger system", "large battery 26    charger system", and "battery backup or UPS" and the   HB1612- 19 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    minimum efficiency standards for a large battery charger 2    system and a battery backup or UPS conform to subsequently 3    adopted modifications in rules authorized and adopted 4    under relevant sections of the California Resources Code, 5    or as authorized under this Act with the minimum standards 6    stated in this paragraph (6).7        (7) Portable electric spas shall, at a minimum, meet 8    the requirements of the "American National Standard for 9    Portable Electric Spa Energy Efficiency" (ANSI/APSP/ICC 10    14-2019).11        (8) In-line residential ventilating fans shall, at a 12    minimum, have a fan motor efficiency of no less than 2.8 13    cubic feet per minute per watt. All other residential 14    ventilating fans shall have a fan motor efficacy of no 15    less than 1.4 cubic feet per minute per watt for airflows 16    less than 90 cubic feet per minute and no less than 2.8 17    cubic feet per minute per watt for other airflows when 18    tested in accordance with Home Ventilation Institute 19    Publication 916, "HVI Airflow Test Procedure".20        (9) Showerheads shall, at a minimum, not exceed a 21    maximum flow rate of 2.0 gallons per minute at 80 pounds 22    per square inch when tested in accordance with 10 CFR Part 23    430, Subpart B, Appendix S, "Uniform Test Method for 24    Measuring the Water Consumption of Faucets and 25    Showerheads".26        (10) Spray sprinkler bodies that are not specifically   HB1612- 20 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    excluded from the scope of the U.S. Environmental 2    Protection Agency's Specification for Spray Sprinkler 3    Bodies, Version 1.0, shall, at a minimum, include an 4    integral pressure regulator and shall, at a minimum, meet 5    the water efficiency and performance criteria and other 6    requirements of that specification.7        (11) Urinals and water closets, other than those 8    designed and marketed exclusively for use at prisons or 9    mental health facilities, shall, at a minimum, meet the 10    standards described in subparagraphs (A) to (C) when 11    tested in accordance with 10 CFR Part 430, Subpart B, 12    Appendix S, "Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Water 13    Consumption of Water Closets and Urinals", and water 14    closets shall, at a minimum, pass the waste extraction 15    test for water closets (Section 7.9) of the American 16    Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) A112.19.2/CSA 17    B45.1-2018. The minimum standards for urinals and water 18    closets are as follows:19            (A) Wall-mounted urinals, except for trough-type 20        urinals, shall, at a minimum, have a maximum flush 21        volume of 0.5 gallons per flush.22            (B) Floor-mounted urinals, except for trough-type 23        urinals, shall, at a minimum, have a maximum flush 24        volume of 0.5 gallons per flush.25            (C) Water closets shall, at a minimum, have a 26        maximum flush volume of 1.28 gallons per flush.  HB1612- 21 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1        (12) Water coolers included in the scope of the ENERGY 2    STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Water 3    Coolers, Version 2.0, shall, at a minimum, have "On Mode 4    with No Water Draw" energy consumption less than or equal 5    to the following values as measured in accordance with the 6    test requirements of that program:7            (A) 0.16 kilowatt hours per day for cold-only 8        units and cook-and-cold units;9            (B) 0.87 kilowatt hours per day for storage-type, 10        hot-and-cold units; and11            (C) 0.18 kilowatt hours per day for on-demand, 12        hot-and-cold units.13    (e) The Agency may adopt rules to establish more stringent 14efficiency standards for covered products, including any other 15products as may be designated by the Director. In considering 16such new or amended standards, the Director shall set 17efficiency standards upon a determination that more stringent 18efficiency standards would serve to promote energy or water 19conservation in the State and would be cost effective for 20consumers who purchase and use such new products. However, no 21new or more stringent efficiency standards shall become 22effective within one year following the adoption of any 23amended rules establishing such more stringent efficiency 24standards.25    (f) The Agency may adopt rules to establish a waiver 26process to grant full or partial waivers to minimum efficiency   HB1612- 22 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1standards, flexible demand appliance standards, or test 2procedures established under this Section. Manufacturers, 3retailers, distributors, or installers of covered products and 4potentially covered products may petition the Agency for a 5waiver. The Agency must make details publicly available of any 6such petition and final ruling. The Agency may grant a waiver 7only if doing so will support the objectives of this Act and 8will not result in a significant erosion of consumer or 9environmental benefits from this Act.10    (g) If any of the energy or water conservation standards 11issued or approved for publication by the Office of the United 12States Secretary of Energy as of January 19, 2025, pursuant to 13the Energy Policy and Conservation Act (Parts 430-431 of Title 1410 of the Code of Federal Regulations), are withdrawn, 15repealed, or otherwise voided, the minimum energy or water 16efficiency level permitted for products previously subject to 17federal energy or water conservation standards in this State 18shall be the applicable federal standards as of January 19, 192025, and no such new product may be sold or offered for sale, 20lease or rent in this State unless it meets or exceeds such 21standards. This Section shall not apply to any federal energy 22or water conservation standard set aside by a court upon the 23petition of a person who will be adversely affected, as 24provided in Section 6306(b) of Title 42 of the United States 25Code.    HB1612- 23 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1    Section 20. Implementation.2    (a) Beginning 180 days after the date upon which the 3standards are adopted by the Agency under Section 15, no new 4covered product may be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent 5in the State unless the new product meets the requirements of 6the standards adopted by the Agency under Section 15.7    (b) Beginning one year after the date upon which the sale 8or offering for sale of covered products becomes subject to 9subsection (a) of this Section, no such products may be 10installed for compensation in the State unless the efficiency 11of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards 12provided under the rules adopted under Section 15. 13    Section 25. Testing, certification, labeling, and 14enforcement.15    (a) The manufacturers of covered products shall test 16samples of their products in accordance with the test 17procedures under this Act. The Agency may adopt rules 18regarding updated test methods when new versions of test 19procedures become available.20    (b) Manufacturers of covered products shall certify to the 21Agency, or to an approved third party as determined by the 22Director, that such products are in compliance with the 23provisions of this Act. Such certifications shall be based on 24test results. The Agency shall adopt rules governing the 25certification of such products and shall coordinate with the   HB1612- 24 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1certification programs of other states and federal agencies 2with similar standards.3    (c) Manufacturers of new covered products shall identify 4each product offered for sale or installation in the State as 5in compliance with the provisions of this Act by means of a 6mark, label, or tag on the product and packaging at the time of 7sale or installation or other similar means as determined by 8the Agency. The Agency shall adopt rules governing the 9identification of such products and packaging, which shall be 10coordinated to the greatest practical extent with the labeling 11programs of other states and federal agencies with equivalent 12efficiency standards. The Agency shall allow the use of 13existing marks, labels, or tags, which connote compliance with 14the efficiency requirements of this Act.15    (d) The Agency shall support compliance with the 16provisions of this Act through outreach and education to 17manufacturers and affected parties who sell or install covered 18products, such as distributors, retailers and contractors. The 19Agency may support these compliance activities directly or 20through collaboration with investor-owned utilities or other 21interested parties such as trade associations or technical or 22trade schools.23    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to limit 24the ability of a utility to offer energy efficient rebates or 25to claim energy savings resulting from such programs, through 26its energy efficiency plans approved by the Illinois Commerce   HB1612- 25 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1Commission under Section 8-103B of the Public Utilities Act.2    (f) The Agency may test covered products. If products so 3tested are found not to be in compliance with the minimum 4efficiency standards adopted under Section 15, the Agency 5shall:6        (1) charge the manufacturer of such product for the 7    cost of product purchase and testing; and8        (2) make information available to the Attorney General 9    and the public on products found not to be in compliance 10    with the standards. 11    (g) The Agency may cause periodic inspections to be made 12of distributors or retailers of new covered products in order 13to determine compliance with the provisions of this Act. The 14Agency shall investigate complaints received concerning 15violations of this Act.16    (h) If the Agency finds that any person has committed a 17violation of any provision of this Act, the Agency shall issue 18a warning to such person. Any person who commits a violation 19after the issuance of such warning shall, following notice and 20an opportunity to be heard, be subject to a civil penalty 21issued by the Agency of up to $100 for each violation. Any 22further violations committed by such person after this second 23violation shall be subject to a civil penalty issued by the 24Agency of not more than $500 for each violation. Each product 25offered, sold, or distributed in violation of this Act shall 26constitute a separate violation, and each day that a violation   HB1612- 26 -LRB104 08810 BDA 18865 b1occurs shall constitute a separate violation. Penalties 2assessed under this subsection are in addition to costs 3assessed under subsection (f) of this Section. The Agency 4shall adopt rules that establish procedures under this 5subsection comporting with due process and that provide for 6the review of final decisions under the Administrative Review 7Law.8    (i) If the Agency finds repeated violations have occurred, 9it shall refer the matter to the Attorney General. The 10Attorney General may institute proceedings to seek an 11injunction in circuit court to enforce the provisions of this 12Act, in addition to any other remedies under this Act or in law 13or equity.14    (j) The Agency may adopt any rules necessary to ensure the 15proper implementation, administration, and enforcement of the 16provisions of this Act. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.